morphology/normalizer/normalizer-relax.xfst
# set char-encoding utf-8
# -*- encoding: utf-8 -*-
# TODOs: 
# -switches: allow -m as -n, -pas as -pis
# yachachinasuykikupaq yacha[VRoot][=saber,habitar][^DB][--]chi[VDeriv][+Caus][^DB][--]na[NS][+Obl][^DB][--]suykiku[NPers][+1.Pl.Excl.Subj_2.Sg.Obj]
# -upallarapuyku LLAra

       #derivation boundary
       define DB [[ "[" "^DB" "]"] :0];

      #Morpheme-Boundary
       define MB [[ "[""--""]"] :0];

       #-------------------------------#
       # Delete all flag on both sides #
       #-------------------------------#
       define Cleanup1 [["@MU"|"@PU"|"@KU"|"@YSI"|"@RI"|"@MPA"|"@CHI"|"@RQU"|"@MI"|"@SI"|"@SIS"|"@CHA"|"@Vdim"|"@YKU"|"@YU"|"@PTI"|"@STI"|"@PA"|"@GENq"|"@TA"|"@AS"|"@ALLI"|"@HATU"|"@POSS"|"@POSSni"|"+ku+"|"+yku+"|"+yu+"|"+rqu+"|"+ru+"|"+pu+"|"+mu+"|%["CARD"%]|"+nn"|"@PLYUQ"|"@NAWPA"|"@CHIQA"|"@YANA"|"@WA"|"@INTR"|"@INTRsu"|"@SU"|"@TRAN"|"@1OBJ"|"+y+"|"@SAPROG"|"@IMP"|"@PLYUQ"|"@ILLA"|"@YURA"|"@CHANI"|"@UKU"|"@WISKA"|"@PLbol"|"@HUM"|"@PORTMANTEAU"|"@EXCEPT"|"@Misspelled"|"@ROOTn"] -> ""];
       define Cleanup2 ["" <- ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@KU"|"@YSI"|"@MPA"|"@RI"|"@CHI"|"@RQU"|"@MI"|"@SI"|"@SIS"|"@CHA"|"@Vdim"|"@YKU"|"@YU"|"@PTI"|"@STI"|"@PA"|"@GENq"|"@TA"|"@AS"|"@ALLI"|"@HATU"|"@POSS"|"@POSSni"|"+ku+"|"+yku+"|"+yu+"|"+rqu+"|"+ru+"|"+pu+"|"+mu+"|"+nn"|"@NAWPA"|"@CHIQA"|"@YANA"|"@WA"|"@INTR"|"@INTRsu"|"@SU"|"@TRAN"|"@1OBJ"|"+y+"|"@SAPROG"|"@IMP"|"@PLYUQ"|"@ILLA"|"@YURA"|"@CHANI"|"@UKU"|"@WISKA"|"@PLbol"|"@HUM"|"@PORTMANTEAU"|"@EXCEPT"|"@Misspelled"|"@ROOTn"] ];

       
############################################################################### 

          #########################
          #                       #
          # PHONETIC VARIATIONS   #
          #                       #
          #########################

      define Vowel [a|e|i|o|u|á|é|í|ó|ú|A|E|I|O|U|Á|É|Í|Ó|Ú|"@TA"|{pa}"@PA"|"@PTI"|"@STI"];
      define Cons [b|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|ñ|p|q|r|s|t|v|w|y|z|'|{m}"@MU"|{m}"@MI"|{s}"@SI"|{ch}"@CHA"|{ntin}"@NTIN"|{p}"@PA"|{q}"@PA"];

      #--------------------------#
      # allow uppercase letters  #
      #--------------------------#

      define LowerCase [A (->) a, B (->) b, C (->) c,D (->) d,E (->) e,F (->) f,G (->) g,H (->) h,I (->) i,J (->) j,K (->) k,L (->) l,M (->) m,N (->) n,O (->) o,P (->) p,Q (->) q,R (->) r,S (->) s,T (->) t,U (->) u,V (->) v,W (->) w,X (->) x,Y (->) y,Z (->) z,Ñ (->) ñ, Á (->) á, É (->) é, Í (->) í, Ó (->) ó, Ú (->) ú ];

      define UpperCase [ a (->) A,b (->) B,c (->) C,d (->) D,e (->) E,f (->) F,g (->) G,h (->) H,i (->) I,j (->) J,k (->) K,l (->) L,m (->) M,n (->) N,o (->) O,p (->) P,q (->) Q,r (->) R,s (->) S,t (->) T,u (->) U,v (->) V,w (->) W,x (->) X,y (->) Y,z (->) Z,ñ (->) Ñ, á (->) Á, é (->) É, í (->) Í, ó (->) Ó, ú (->) Ú ];


      #-------------------------------------------------------------------#
      # Ersetze optional u durch o und i durch e, falls in Umgebung von q #
      # relax: also with -m in between                                    #
      #-------------------------------------------------------------------#

      define Allophone1 [ u (->) o||  _ ((s|t|n|r|l|{ll}|m) (a|e|i|o|u))* q, q ((a|e|i|o|u) (s|t|n|r|h|l|'|{ll}|m))*  _  , _ ((s|t|n|r|l|m|{ll}) (a|e|i|o|u))* {cc}, {cc} ((a|e|i|o|u) (s|t|n|r|h|l|'|{ll}|m))* _ ] .o. [i (->) e || _ ((s|t|n|r|h|l|{ll}|m) (a|e|i|o|u))* q, q ((a|e|i|o|u) (s|t|n|r|l|{ll}|h|'|m))* _ , _ ((s|t|n|r|h|l|m|{ll}) (a|e|i|o|u))* {cc}, {cc} ((a|e|i|o|u) (s|t|n|r|l|m|{ll}|'))* _  ];
      define Allophone2 [ {ll} (->) l || _ [q|k] ];
      define Allophone3 [ {s} (->) {sh} || _ k ];

      define Allophone [Allophone1 .o. Allophone2 .o. Allophone3] ;
      define AllophoneBeforeCleanUp [ m (->) n || \"@MPA" _ p ];
      define Apo [' (->) ’] ;

       #---------------------------#
       # alternative orthographies #
       #---------------------------#

       # dialecatal variations
       define Orthography1 [ {ch} (->) {ts}, {Ch} (->) {Ts} ];
       
       # spanish Orthographies
       define Orthography2 [ {q} (->) {cc}, {Q} (->) {Cc}, q (->) {ck}];
       define Orthography3 [ {wi} (->) {hui}, {Wi} (->) {Hui}  ];
       define Orthography4 [ {wa} (->) {hua}, {Wa} (->) {Hua} ];
       define Orthography5 [ {wa} (->) {gua}, {Wa} (->) {Gua}];
       define Orthography6 [ {ch'} (->) {chch}, {ch'} (->) {chh}, s (->) {ss}, {chh} (->) {ch} , {chh} (->) {chch}];
       define Orthography7 [ {q'} (->) {qq} , {q'} (->) {kc} , {qh} (->) {kc} , {q'i} (->) {qque}, {qi} (->) {qque} ];
       define Orthography8 [ {t'} (->) {tt} , {k'} (->) {kc} , {th} (->) {tj}];
       define Orthography9 [ {k'} (->) {kk} ,{kh} (->) {cj} ];
       define Orthography10 [ {p'} (->) {pp} , {ph} (->) {pj}];
       define Orthography11 [ {ay} (->) {ai} , {yku} (->) {yqu}, {yki} (->) {iqui}];
       define Orthography12 [ n (->) m || _ p];
       define Orthography13 [ {w} (->) {u} || Vowel _ ];
       define Orthography14 [ {k} (->) {qu} || _ [i|e] ];
       define Orthography15 [ {k} (->) {c} || _ [a|l|m|n|ñ|o|p|r|s|t|u|y]];
       define Orthography16 [ {w} (->) {v}];  
       
       # fricatives in syllable coda
       define Orthography17 [ {h} (->) {j}, {H} (->) {J} ||  [a|i|l|m|n|r|u] _ Vowel ];
       define Orthography18 [ [{k}|{q}] (->) {j} || Vowel_ ];       
       define Orthography19 [ {ph} (->) {f}];    
       define Orthography20 [ {q} (->) {x} || Vowel_ ];  
  
              
       define Orthography [Orthography1 .o. Orthography2 .o. Orthography3 .o. Orthography4 .o. Orthography5 .o.  Orthography6 .o. Orthography7 .o. Orthography8 .o. Orthography9 .o. Orthography10 .o. Orthography11 .o. Orthography12 .o. Orthography13 .o. Orthography14 .o. Orthography15 .o. Orthography16 .o. Orthography17 .o. Orthography18 .o. Orthography19 .o. Orthography20];

       define QuechuaOrtho Allophone .o. Orthography;

       # apply after Cleanup
       define Accent1 [ a (->) á, u (->) ú ||  _ [w|y] .#.];
       define Accent2 [ {qa} (->) {qá}, {taq} (->) {táq}, {ri} (->) {rí}|| _  .#.];
       define Accent Accent1 .o. Accent2;
       
       #-------------------------------------------------#
       # Orthography of Spanish loan words:              #
       #                                                 #
       #- may be written with or without their accents   #
       #- e may be written as i, o as u in Spanish words #
       #-------------------------------------------------#
       define AccentES [ á (->) a,é (->) [e|i],í (->) i, ó (->) [o|u],ú (->) u, ü (->) u, Á (->) A, É (->) E, Í (->) I, Ó (->) O, Ú (->) U];
       define AccentES2 [ a (->) á,e (->) é, i (->) í,o (->) ó, u (->) ú, u (->) ü ];
       define spanLetras [ e (->) i, i (->) e, o (->) u, u (->) o, c (->) k , d (->) t, g (->)j, w  (->) o, b (->) p, v (->) w, z (->) s , j (->) h];
       define SpanOrtho AccentES .o. AccentES2 .o. spanLetras;
########################################################################
########################################################################
##                                                                    ##
##               MORPHOPHONOLOGICAL RULES                             ##
##                                                                    ##
########################################################################
########################################################################

      ###########
      # NOMINAL #
      ###########

      #-----------------------------------------------------#
      # Possessive -nkuna -> ambiguous: -n-kuna or nku-kuna #
      #-----------------------------------------------------#

      # define 3PossPl  [ {nku} %["NPers"%] %["+3.Pl.Poss"%] (<-) n %["NPers"%] %["+3.Sg.Poss"%] \\  _ %["--"%]{kuna}%["Num"%] ];
       define 3PossPl  [  %["+3.Poss"%] <-  %["+3.Sg.Poss"%] \\  _ %["--"%]{kuna}%["Num"%] ];

       #----------------------------------------------------#
       # Possessive -ykuna -> ambiguous: y-kuna or yku-kuna #
       #----------------------------------------------------#

      # define 1PossPl [ {yku} %["NPers"%] %["+1.Pl.Excl.Poss"%] (<-) y %["NPers"%] %["+1.Sg.Poss"%] \\  _ %["--"%]{kuna}%["Num"%] ];
       define 1PossPl [  %["+1.Poss"%] <-  %["+1.Sg.Poss"%] \\  _ %["--"%]{kuna}%["Num"%] ];

       define PossessivPlural [3PossPl .o. 1PossPl];

       #------------------------------------------------------------#
       # Genitive -pa after Konsonant, -q/-p after Vowel (optional) #
       #------------------------------------------------------------#
      # define GENITIV [ {pa}"@PA" (->) [{p}|{q}]"@PA"  ||Vowel  _ ];
	define PA1 [  {q}"@PA"  => Vowel _  ];
	define PA2 [  {p}"@PA"  => Vowel _  ];
	#define PA3 [  {pa}"@PA" => Cons _  ];
      define GENITIV PA1 .o. PA2 ;

       #--------------------------------------------------------#
       # Possessive forms need euphon. -ni/-ñi after Consonants #
       #--------------------------------------------------------#

        #define POSSESSIV1 [ {@POSS} -> [{ni}|{ñi}]  || Cons _ ];
        #define POSSESSIV2 [ {@POSS} ->  "" || Vowel _ ];
	#define POSSESSIV POSSESSIV1 .o. POSSESSIV2;

	define POSS1 [ "@POSS"  => Vowel _  ];
	define POSS2 [ "@POSSni" => Cons _  ];
	
	# misspelled -yki after -i: wasiki -> recognized as wasiyki
	define POSS3 [ "@Misspelled" => [{i}|"@PTI"] _  ];

        define POSSESSIV POSS1 .o. POSS2 .o. POSS3;

        define NounRules GENITIV .o. POSSESSIV;
        
       #------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # restrict plural -s to a position before case suffixes, otherwise assume it's the indirect evidential #
       #------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       define BolPl [  "@PLbol"  =>  _ ?* "Cas" ];
      
      define NounRulesUpper BolPl;

       ##########
       # VERBAL #
       ##########

       #--------------------------------------------------------#
       # CONTEXT RESTRICTIONS:                                  #
       # na as +Rzpr has be followed by ku, chi or spa          #
       # mu shortened to 'n' is only allowed preceding pu       #
       #--------------------------------------------------------#
       define naRzpr [  "+Rzpr"  => _ ?* ["+Rflx_Int"|"+Caus"|"+SS"] ];
       define shortYKU [  "+y+"  => _ %["VDeriv"%] %["+Aff"%] "@YKU" %["^DB"%] %["--"%]{wa}%["VPers"%] ];

       # transitive forms
       define watrans [  "@WA"  => "+1.Obj" ?* _  ];
       define sutrans [  "@SU"  => "+2.Obj" ?* _  ];
       
       # sometimes inverted sequence (with "@PORTMANTEAU" ): 
       # sqa-sunki, rqa-sunki instead of su-rqa-nki -> limit these forms to after +Prog, +NPst, +Ipst
       define portmanteau [  "@PORTMANTEAU"  => ["+IPst"|"+Prog"|"+NPst"] ?* _  ];
       
       #-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # if in lower side {rqu} as {rqa}, {pu} as {pa} etc. -> we want those forms to appear on the upper side as well               #
       # (otherwise rqa/pa would appear as rqu/pu in the output, which would be wrong given the morphological context of these forms #
       # for normalizer: rewrite ru as rqu and ra as rqa, respectivly  same with  yu/yku, ya/yka                                     #
       # NOTE: sequence -rqa-ku will be normalized to -rqu-ku !                                                                      #
       #-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
